Utah statutes.
76-9-503.   Presumption of malice -- Reading or seeing by another not
necessary -- Liability of newspaper or serial publication personnel.
(1) An injurious publication is presumed to have been malicious if no
justifiable motive for making it is shown.
(2)  To sustain a charge of publishing a libel, it is not essential that the
words or things complained of should have been read or seen by another. It is
adequate that the accused knowingly parted with the immediate custody of the
libel under circumstances which exposed it to be read or seen by any other
person than himself.
(3)  Each author, editor, and proprietor of any newspaper or serial
publication is chargeable with the publication of any words contained in any
part of a book or number or a newspaper or serial.
